Illinois, session 104th, HB2583.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 10-80 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/10-80 new)7    Sec. 10-80. Property tax relief pilot program. 8    (a) Subject to the reallocation by the General Assembly of 9moneys appropriated for Illinois Welcoming Centers pursuant to 10Section 15 of Article 63 of Public Act 103-589 or the 11appropriation of moneys in the State Fiscal Year 2026 budget 12for the purposes of this Section, the Department shall 13establish a pilot program to pay one-time property tax rebates 14to qualified applicants who apply with the Department for a 15rebate under this Section. Only one rebate may be awarded for 16any single parcel of eligible homestead property. Applications 17shall be submitted to the Department in the form and manner 18required by the Department by rule. The amount of the rebate 19provided under this Section shall be determined by the 20Department; however, the aggregate amount of rebates awarded 21by the Department under this Section may not exceed the total 22amount reallocated by the General Assembly for that purpose. 23When determining the amount of the rebate, the Department   HB2583- 2 -LRB104 03698 HLH 13722 b1shall attempt to maximize the number of qualified applicants 2who receive rebates under this Section.3    The Department may adopt rules to implement and administer 4this Section. 5    (b) As used in this Section:6    "Homestead property" has the meaning given to that term in 7Section 15-175 of the Property Tax Code. 8    "Qualified applicant" means an individual who (i) is 9responsible for the payment of property taxes for the 2023 tax 10year, due in 2024, on homestead property located in Bloom, 11Calumet, Rich, Thornton, or Bremen Township in Cook County and 12(ii) is a member of a low-income or moderate-income household, 13as determined by the Department by rule. 14    (c) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027.  15    Section 10. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 16amended by adding Section 5-45.65 as follows: 17    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.65 new)18    Sec. 5-45.65. Emergency rulemaking; property tax relief 19pilot program. To provide for the expeditious and timely 20implementation of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 21Assembly, emergency rules implementing the Section 10-80 of 22the Department of Human Services Act may be adopted in 23accordance with Section 5-45 by the Department of Human 24Services. The adoption of emergency rules authorized by   HB2583- 3 -LRB104 03698 HLH 13722 b1Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to be necessary for the 2public interest, safety, and welfare.3    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 4of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.